North Dakota statutes. TITLE 10 Corporations
CHAPTER 10-19.1 North Dakota Business Corporation Act
10-19.1-99.
Articles of merger — Certificate.

Upon receiving the approval required by section 10-19.1-98, articles of merger must be prepared which contain:

The plan of merger; and

A statement that the plan is approved by each constituent organization under this chapter or under its governing statute in the case of any other organization.

The articles of merger must be signed on behalf of each constituent organization and filed with the secretary of state, together with the fees provided in section 10-19.1-147.

The secretary of state shall issue a certificate of merger to the surviving constituent organization or the surviving constituent organization’s legal representative. The certificate must contain the effective date of merger.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 147, § 3; 1991, ch. 98, § 14; 1993, ch. 54, § 41; 1999, ch. 50, § 14; 1999, ch. 95, § 30; 2007, ch. 101, § 25.

Derivation:

N.D.C.C. 10-20-04.

10-19.1-100.
Merger of subsidiary into parent.

If either the parent or the subsidiary is a domestic organization, then a parent that is a domestic or foreign organization owning at least ninety percent of the outstanding ownership interests of each class and series of a subsidiary that is a domestic or foreign organization directly, or indirectly through related organizations other than classes or series that, absent this section, would otherwise not be entitled to vote on the merger:

May merge the subsidiary into the parent or into any other subsidiary at least ninety percent of the outstanding ownership interests of each class and series of which is owned by the parent directly, or indirectly through related organizations other than classes or series that, absent this section, would otherwise not be entitled to vote on the merger, without a vote of the owners of the parent or any subsidiary; or

May merge the parent, or the parent and one or more subsidiaries into one of the subsidiaries under this section.

A resolution approved by the present directors of the parent as required by section 10-19.1-46 in the case of a domestic corporation or by the present members of the governing body of the parent as required by its governing statute in the case of any other organization must set forth a plan of merger that contains:

The name of the subsidiary or subsidiaries, the name of the parent, and the name of the surviving constituent organization;

The manner and basis of converting the ownership interests of the subsidiary or subsidiaries or the parent into securities or ownership interests of the parent, of the subsidiary, or of another organization; or, in whole or in part, into money or other property;

If the parent is a constituent organization but is not the surviving constituent organization in the merger, a provision for the pro rata issuance of ownership interests of the surviving constituent organization to the owners of ownership interests of the parent on surrender of any ownership interests of the parent; and

If the surviving constituent organization is a subsidiary, a statement of any amendments to the articles of the surviving constituent organization that will be part of the merger.

Notwithstanding subsection 1:

If the parent is a domestic corporation and the conditions of subsection 4 of section 10-19.1-98 are not met with respect to the parent, then the resolution is not effective unless it is approved by the affirmative vote of the holders of a majority of the voting power of all shares of the parent entitled to vote at a regular or special meeting held in accordance with section 10-19.1-98; and

If the parent is a domestic or foreign organization and is not the surviving organization in the merger, then the resolution is not effective unless it is also approved in the manner provided in the governing statute of the parent.

Notwithstanding subsection 3, if the parent is a constituent organization and is the surviving organization in the merger, it may change its corporate name, without a vote of its owners, by the inclusion of a provision to that effect in the resolution of merger setting forth the plan of merger that is approved by the affirmative vote of a majority of the board members of the parent present. Upon the effective date of the merger, the name of the parent must be changed.

If the subsidiary is a domestic organization, then notice of the action, including a copy of the plan of merger must be given to each owner, other than the parent and any subsidiary, of each subsidiary that is a constituent organization in the merger before, or within ten days after, the effective date of the merger.

Articles of merger must be prepared which contain:

The plan of merger;

The number of outstanding ownership interests of each class and series of the subsidiary that is a constituent organization in the merger, other than the classes or series that, absent this section, would otherwise not be entitled to vote on the merger, and the number of ownership interests of each class and series owned, other than the classes or series that, absent this section, would otherwise not be entitled to vote on the merger, by the parent directly, or indirectly through related constituent organizations; and

A statement that the plan of merger is approved by the parent under this section.

The articles of merger must be signed on behalf of the parent and filed with the secretary of state, with the fees provided in section 10-19.1-147.

The secretary of state shall issue a certificate of merger to the surviving constituent organization or the legal representative of the surviving constituent organization. The certificate must contain the effective date of the merger.

If all of the ownership interests of one or more domestic subsidiaries that is a constituent organization to a merger under this section are not owned by the parent directly, or indirectly through related constituent organizations, immediately before the merger, then the owners of each domestic subsidiary which is either a limited liability company or a corporation, have dissenter’s rights under section 10-19.1-87, without regard to subsection 3 of section 10-19.1-87 or 10-32.1-33, and under section 10-19.1-88.

If the parent is a constituent organization but is not the surviving organization in the merger, the articles of incorporation or articles of organization of the surviving organization immediately after the merger differ from the articles of incorporation or articles of organization of the parent immediately before the merger in a manner that would entitle an owner of the parent to dissenter’s rights under subdivision a of subsection 1 of section 10-19.1-87 or section 10-32.1-33, and the articles of incorporation or articles of organization of the surviving constituent organization constitute an amendment to the articles of incorporation or articles of organization of the parent, then that owner of the parent has dissenter’s rights as provided under section 10-19.1-87 or 10-32.1-33.

Except as provided in this subsection, section 10-19.1-87 does not apply to any merger affected under this section.

A merger among a parent and one or more subsidiaries or among two or more subsidiaries of a parent may be accomplished under sections 10-19.1-97 through 10-19.1-99 instead of this section, in which case this section does not apply.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 147, § 3; 1991, ch. 98, § 15; 1993, ch. 54, § 42; 1995, ch. 103, § 38; 1999, ch. 50, § 15; 1999, ch. 95, § 31; 2001, ch. 112, § 12; 2003, ch. 85, § 16; 2007, ch. 101, § 26; 2015, ch. 87, § 9, effective July 1, 2015.

Derivation:

N.D.C.C. 10-20-05.

10-19.1-100.1.
Merger to effect a holding company reorganization.

For purposes of this section:

“Holding company” means the corporation that is or becomes the direct parent of the surviving corporation of a merger accomplished under this section.

“Parent constituent corporation” means the parent corporation that merges with or into the subsidiary constituent corporation.

“Subsidiary constituent corporation” means the subsidiary corporation that the parent constituent corporation merges with or into in the merger.

Unless its articles expressly provide otherwise, and subject to subsection 3, a parent constituent corporation may merge with or into a subsidiary constituent corporation without a vote of the shareholders of the parent constituent corporation.

A merger may be accomplished under this section only if each of the following requirements is met:

The holding company and the constituent corporations to the merger are each organized under this chapter;

At all times following the issuance of shares until the consummation of a merger under this section, the holding company was a direct wholly owned subsidiary of the parent constituent corporation;

Immediately before the consummation of a merger under this section, the subsidiary constituent corporation is an indirect wholly owned subsidiary of the parent constituent corporation and a direct wholly owned subsidiary of the holding company;

The parent constituent corporation and the subsidiary constituent corporation are the only constituent corporations to the merger;

Immediately after the merger becomes effective, the surviving corporation becomes or remains a direct wholly owned subsidiary of the holding company;

Each share or fraction of a share of the parent constituent corporation outstanding immediately before the effective time of the merger is converted in the merger into a share or equal fraction of a share of the holding company having the same designation and relative rights and preferences, and the same restrictions thereon, as the share or fraction of a share of the parent constituent corporation being converted in the merger;

The articles and bylaws of the holding company immediately following the effective time of the merger contain provisions identical to the articles and bylaws of the parent constituent corporation immediately before the effective time of the merger, other than provisions, if any, regarding the incorporator or incorporators, the corporate name, the registered office and agent, the initial board, and the initial subscribers for shares and the provisions contained in any amendment to the articles of the parent constituent corporation that were necessary to effect an exchange, reclassification, or cancellation of shares if the exchange, reclassification, or cancellation has become effective;

The articles and bylaws of the surviving corporation immediately following the effective time of the merger are identical to the articles and bylaws of the parent constituent corporation immediately before the effective time of the merger, other than provisions, if any, regarding the incorporator or incorporators, the corporate name, the registered office and agent, the initial board, and the initial subscribers for shares and the provisions contained in any amendment to the articles of the parent constituent corporation that were necessary to effect an exchange, reclassification, or cancellation of shares if the exchange, reclassification, or cancellation has become effective, except that:

The articles of the surviving corporation shall be amended in the merger to contain a provision requiring that any act or transaction by or involving the surviving corporation, other than the election or removal of directors of the surviving corporation, that requires for its adoption under this chapter or its articles the approval of the shareholders of the surviving corporation shall, by specific reference to this section, require, in addition, the approval of the shareholders of the holding company, or any successor by merger, by the same vote as is required by this chapter or the articles of the surviving corporation; and

The articles of the surviving corporation may be amended in the merger to reduce the number of classes, series, and shares that the surviving corporation is authorized to issue;

The directors of the parent constituent corporation become or remain the directors of the holding company immediately after the merger becomes effective;

The board of the parent constituent corporation determines that the shareholders of the parent constituent corporation will not recognize gain or loss for United States federal income tax purposes; and

A resolution approved by the affirmative vote of a majority of the directors of the parent constituent corporation present sets forth a plan of merger that contains provisions addressing the requirements of subdivisions a through j.

Neither paragraph 1 of subdivision h of subsection 3, nor any provisions of the surviving corporation’s articles required by that item may be construed to require approval of the shareholders of the holding company to elect or remove directors of the surviving corporation.

If the name of the holding company at the time the merger takes effect is the same as the name of the parent constituent corporation immediately before that time, the shares of the holding company into which the shares of the parent constituent corporations are converted in the merger must, unless new certificates are issued, be represented by the share certificates that previously represented shares of the parent constituent corporation.

Articles of merger must be:

Prepared that contain:

The plan of merger; and

A statement that the plan of merger was adopted under this section.

Signed on behalf of the parent constituent corporation and filed with the secretary of state.

The secretary of state shall issue a certificate of merger to the surviving corporation or its legal representative.

A merger between a parent and a subsidiary may be accomplished under sections 10-19.1-97, 10-19.1-98, 10-19.1-99, and 10-19.1-100 instead of this section, in which case this section does not apply.

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 85, § 17; 2007, ch. 101, § 27.

10-19.1-101.
Abandonment of plan of merger or exchange.

After a plan of merger or exchange is approved by the owners entitled to vote on the approval of the plan as provided in section 10-19.1-98 and before the effective date of the plan, the plan may be abandoned:

With respect to the approval of the abandonment:

If the owners of the ownership interests of each of the constituent organizations entitled to vote on the approval of the plan as provided in section 10-19.1-98 have approved the abandonment at a meeting by the affirmative vote of the owners of a majority of the voting power of the ownership interests entitled to vote;

If the owners of a constituent organization are not entitled to vote on the approval of the plan under section 10-19.1-98, the governing body of the constituent organization has approved the abandonment by the affirmative vote required by section 10-19.1-46 in the case of a domestic corporation or by its governing statute in the case of any other organization; and

If the merger or exchange is with a foreign organization, then if abandonment is approved in the manner as may be required by the governing statute of the foreign organization;

If the plan itself provides for abandonment and all conditions for abandonment set forth in the plan are met; or

Pursuant to subsection 2.

If articles of merger are not filed with the secretary of state and the plan is to be abandoned or if a plan of exchange is to be abandoned before the effective date of the plan, then a resolution by the governing body of any constituent organization abandoning the plan of merger or exchange may be approved by the affirmative vote of the governing body required by section 10-19.1-46 in the case of a domestic corporation or by its governing statute in the case of any other organization, subject to the contract rights of any other person under the plan.

If articles of merger are filed with the secretary of state, but are not yet effective, the constituent organizations, in the case of abandonment under paragraph 1 of subdivision a of subsection 1, then the constituent organization or any one of them under paragraph 2 of subdivision a of subsection 1, as the abandoning constituent organization in the case of abandonment under subsection 2, shall file with the secretary of state, with the fees provided in section 10-19.1-147, articles of abandonment that contain:

The names of the constituent organizations;

The provision of this section under which the plan is abandoned; and

The text of the resolution approved by the affirmative vote of a majority of the directors present abandoning the plan.

If the certificate of merger is issued, then the governing body shall surrender the certificate to the secretary of state upon filing the articles of abandonment.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 147, § 3; 1991, ch. 98, § 16; 1993, ch. 54, § 43; 1999, ch. 50, § 16; 1999, ch. 95, § 32; 2007, ch. 101, § 28.

Derivation:

N.D.C.C. 10-20-03.

10-19.1-102.
Effective date of merger or exchange — Effect.

A merger is effective when the articles of merger are filed with the secretary of state or on a later date specified in the articles of merger. An exchange is effective on the date specified in the plan of exchange.

When a merger becomes effective:

The constituent organizations become a single entity, the surviving organization.

The separate existence of all constituent organizations except the surviving organization ceases.

As to any corporation that was a constituent organization and is not the surviving constituent organization, the articles of merger serve as articles of termination, and unless previously filed, the notice of dissolution.

The surviving organization has all the rights, privileges, immunities, and powers and is subject to all of the duties and liabilities of the specified organization under its governing statute.

The surviving organization possesses all the rights, privileges, immunities, and franchises, of a public as well as of a private nature, of each of the constituent organizations.

All property and all debts due on any account, including subscriptions to ownership interests and all other choses in action, and every other interest of or belonging to or due to each of the constituent organizations vests in the surviving organization without any further act or deed.

Confirmatory deeds, assignments, or similar instruments to accomplish that vesting may be signed and delivered at any time in the name of a constituent organization by the organization’s current officers, managers, or governing body, as the case may be, or, if the organization no longer exists, by the last officers, managers, or governing body of the organization.

The title to any real estate or any interest vested in any of the constituent organizations does not revert nor in any way become impaired by reason of the merger.

The surviving organization is responsible and liable for all the liabilities and obligations of each of the constituent organizations.

A claim of or against or a pending proceeding by or against a constituent organization may be prosecuted as if the merger did not take place, or the surviving organization may be substituted in the place of the constituent organization.

Neither the rights of creditors nor any liens upon the property of a constituent organization are impaired by the merger.

The articles of the surviving organization are deemed to be amended to the extent that changes in its articles, if any, are contained in the plan of merger.

When a merger or exchange becomes effective, the ownership interests to be converted or exchanged under the terms of the plan cease to exist in the case of a merger, or are deemed to be exchanged in the case of an exchange. The owners of those ownership interests are entitled only to the securities, money, or other property into which those ownership interests have been converted or for which those ownership interests have been exchanged in accordance with the plan, subject to any dissenter’s rights under section 10-19.1-87 or 10-32.1-33.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 147, § 3; 1999, ch. 95, § 33; 2007, ch. 101, § 29; 2015, ch. 87, § 10, effective July 1, 2015.

Derivation:

N.D.C.C. 10-20-06.

Collateral References.

Tax liabilities as within agreement for assumption or payment of another’s obligations, 4 A.L.R.2d 1314.

Federal diversity of citizenship jurisdiction, merger or consolidation as creating multistate corporation for purposes of, 25.27 A.L.R.2d 745, 777.

Charitable trust of which corporation is beneficiary, merger or consolidation of corporation as terminating, 34 A.L.R.3d 749.

Similarity of ownership or control as basis for charging corporation acquiring assets of another with liability for former owner’s debts, 49 A.L.R.3d 881.

Validity and construction of state statute making successor corporation liable for taxes of predecessor, 65 A.L.R.3d 1181.

Liability of successor corporation for injury or damage caused by product issued by predecessor, 66 A.L.R.3d 824.

Form of business organization of successor or predecessor as affecting successor liability, 32 A.L.R.4th 196.

10-19.1-102.1.
Continuance of corporate authority.

When an act or record is considered necessary or appropriate to evidence the vesting of property or other rights in the single corporation, the persons with authority to do so under the articles, bylaws, or member-control agreement of each constituent organization shall do the act or sign and deliver the record and for this purpose, the existence of the constituent organizations and the authority of those persons is continued.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 100, § 25; 2007, ch. 101, § 30.

10-19.1-103.
Merger or exchange with foreign organization.

A domestic corporation may merge with, including a merger pursuant to section 10-19.1-100, or participate in an exchange with a foreign organization by following the procedures set forth in this section, if:

With respect to a merger, the merger is permitted by its governing statute.

With respect to an exchange, the constituent organization whose ownership interests will be acquired is a domestic organization, regardless of whether the exchange is permitted by its governing statute.

Each domestic corporation shall comply with the provisions of sections 10-19.1-96 through 10-19.1-103 with respect to the merger or exchange of ownership interests and each foreign organization shall comply with the applicable provisions of its governing statute.

If the surviving organization in a merger will be a domestic corporation, then the organization shall comply with this chapter.

If the surviving organization in a merger will be a foreign organization and will transact business in this state, then the organization shall comply with the provisions of its governing statute. In every case, the surviving foreign organization shall file with the secretary of state:

An agreement that it may be served with process in this state in a proceeding for the enforcement of an obligation of a constituent organization and in a proceeding for the enforcement of the rights of a dissenting owner of an ownership interest of a constituent organization against the surviving foreign organization;

An irrevocable appointment of the secretary of state as the agent of the organization to accept service of process in any proceeding, and an address to which process may be forwarded as provided in section 10-01.1-13; and

An agreement that the organization will promptly pay to the dissenting owners of ownership interests of each domestic constituent organization the amount, if any, to which they are entitled under its governing statute.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 147, § 3; 1993, ch. 54, § 44; 1999, ch. 50, § 17; 1999, ch. 95, § 34; 2005, ch. 100, § 26; 2007, ch. 99, § 15; 2007, ch. 101, § 31.

Derivation:

N.D.C.C. 10-20-07.

Collateral References.

Merger or consolidation as creating multi-state corporation for purposes of federal diversity of citizenship jurisdiction, 27 A.L.R.2d 745, 777.

10-19.1-104.
Transfer of assets — When permitted.

A corporation, by affirmative vote of a majority of the directors present upon those terms and conditions and for those considerations, which may be money, securities, or other instruments for the payment of money or other property, as the board deems expedient, and without shareholder approval, may:

Sell, lease, transfer, or otherwise dispose of all or substantially all of its property and assets in the usual and regular course of its business;

Grant a security interest in all or substantially all of its property and assets whether or not in the usual and regular course of its business; or

Transfer any or all of its property to an organization all the ownership interests of which are owned directly, or indirectly through wholly owned organizations, by the corporation.

With respect to shareholders’ approval:

A corporation, by affirmative vote of a majority of the directors present, may sell, lease, transfer, or otherwise dispose of all or substantially all of its property and assets, including its good will, not in the usual and regular course of its business, upon those terms and conditions and for those considerations, which may be money, securities, or other instruments for the payment of money or other property, as the board deems expedient, when approved at a regular or special meeting of the shareholders by the affirmative vote of the holders of a majority of the voting power of the shares entitled to vote.

Written notice of the meeting must be given to all shareholders whether or not they are entitled to vote at the meeting.

The written notice must state that a purpose of the meeting is to consider the sale, lease, transfer, or other disposition of all or substantially all of the property and assets of the corporation.

Shareholder approval is not required under subdivision a if, following the sale, lease, transfer, or other disposition of its property and assets, the corporation retains a significant continuing business activity. The corporation will conclusively be deemed to have retained a significant continuing business activity if the corporation retains a business activity that represented at least:

Twenty-five percent of the corporation’s total assets at the end of the most recently completed fiscal year; and

Twenty-five percent of either income from continuing operations before taxes or revenues from continuing operations for that fiscal year, measured on a consolidated basis with its subsidiaries for each of paragraphs 1 and 2.

Confirmatory deeds, assignments, or similar instruments to evidence a sale, lease, transfer, or other disposition may be signed and delivered at any time in the name of the transferor by its current officers or, if the corporation no longer exists, by its last officers.

The transferee is liable for the debts, obligations, and liabilities of the transferor only to the extent provided in the contract or agreement between the transferee and the transferor or to the extent provided by this chapter or other statutes of this state. A disposition of all or substantially all of the property and assets of the corporation under this section is not considered to be a merger or a de facto merger pursuant to this chapter or otherwise. The transferee shall not be liable solely because it is deemed to be a continuation of the transferor.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 147, § 3; 1995, ch. 103, § 39; 2005, ch. 100, § 27; 2007, ch. 101, § 32; 2011, ch. 87, § 20.

Derivation:

N.D.C.C. 10-20-09, 10-20-10, 10-20-11.

10-19.1-104.1.
Conversion.

An organization other than a corporation may convert to a corporation, and a corporation may convert to another organization other than a general partnership as provided in this section and sections 10-19.1-104.2 through 10-19.1-104.6 and a plan of conversion, if:

The governing statute of the other organization authorizes the conversion;

The conversion is not prohibited by the law of the jurisdiction that enacted the governing statute; and

The other organization complies with its governing statute in effecting the conversion.

For the purposes of sections 10-19.1-104.1 through 10-19.1-104.6, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Act of the board” means action by the board as provided in section 10-19.1-46 whether:

At a meeting of the board as provided in section 10-19.1-43; or

By a written action of the board as provided in section 10-19.1-47.

“Act of the governing body” means action by the governing body of any organization, other than a domestic corporation, in the manner provided in the governing statute.

“Act of the owners” means action by the owners of an organization, other than a domestic corporation, in the manner provided in its governing statute.

“Act of the shareholders” means action by the shareholders as provided in section 10-19.1-74 whether:

At a meeting of the shareholders as provided in sections 10-19.1-71 and 10-19.1-72; or

By a written action of the shareholders as provided in section 10-19.1-75.

“Certificate of creation” means:

A certificate of incorporation, if the converted organization is a corporation deemed to be incorporated under this chapter;

A certificate of organization, if the converted organization is a limited liability company deemed to be organized under chapter 10-32.1;

A certificate of limited partnership, if the converted organization is a limited partnership deemed to be formed under chapter 45-10.2;

The filed registration of a limited liability partnership, if the converted organization is a limited liability partnership deemed to be established under chapter 45-22; or

A certificate of limited liability limited partnership, if the converted organization is a limited liability limited partnership deemed to be formed under chapter 45-23.

“Date of origin” means the date on which:

A corporation which is:

The converting organization was incorporated; or

The converted organization is deemed to be incorporated;

A limited liability company which is:

The converting organization was organized; or

The converted organization is deemed to be organized;

A general partnership that is the converting organization was formed;

A limited partnership which is:

The converting organization was formed; or

The converted organization is deemed to be formed;

A limited liability partnership which is:

The converting organization was formed; or

The converted organization is deemed to be formed; and

A limited liability limited partnership which is:

The converting organization was formed; or

The converted organization is deemed to be formed.

“Filed registration” means the registration of a limited liability partnership which has been filed with the secretary of state.

“General partnership” means an organization formed under chapters 45-13 through 45-21.

“Organizational records” means for an organization which is:

A corporation, its articles of incorporation and bylaws;

A limited liability company, its articles of organization, operating agreement or bylaws, and any member-control agreement;

A limited partnership, its partnership agreement;

A limited liability partnership, its partnership agreement; or

A limited liability limited partnership, its partnership agreement.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 100, § 28; 2007, ch. 101, § 33; 2015, ch. 87, § 11, effective July 1, 2015.

10-19.1-104.2.
Plan of conversion.

A plan of conversion must be in a record and must contain:

The name and form of the converting organization before conversion;

The name and form of the converted organization after conversion;

The terms and conditions of the proposed conversion;

The manner and basis of converting each ownership interest in the converting organization into ownership interests in the converted organization or, in whole or in part, into money or other property;

The organizational records of the converted organization; and

Any other provisions with respect to the proposed conversion that are deemed necessary or desirable.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 100, § 29.

10-19.1-104.3.
Plan approval and amendment.

If the converting organization is a corporation, then:

A resolution containing or amending the plan of conversion must be approved by an act of the board of the converting corporation and must then be approved by an act of its shareholders.

In the action by the shareholders, a class or series of shares is entitled to vote as a class or series on the approval or amendment of the plan.

Any amendment of the plan is subject to any contractual rights.

If the resolution containing or amending the plan of conversion is approved by the shareholders:

At a shareholder meeting, then:

Written notice must be given to every shareholder of the converting corporation, whether or not entitled to vote at the meeting, not less than fourteen days nor more than fifty days before the meeting, in the manner provided in section 10-19.1-73.

The written notice must state that a purpose of the meeting is to consider the proposed plan of conversion or an amendment to it.

A copy or short description of the plan of conversion or the amendment to it must be included in or enclosed with the notice.

By a written action of the shareholders, then a copy or short description of the plan of conversion or the amendment to it must be included in or attached to the written action.

If the converting organization is not a corporation, then the approval and amendment of the plan of conversion must comply with its governing statute in effecting the conversion.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 100, § 30.

10-19.1-104.4.
Articles of conversion.

Upon receiving the approval required by section 10-19.1-104.3, articles of conversion must be prepared in a record that must contain:

A statement that the converting organization is being converted into another organization, including:

The name of the converting organization immediately before the filing of the articles of conversion;

The name to which the name of the converting organization is to be changed, which must be a name that satisfies the laws applicable to the converted organization;

The form of organization that the converted organization will be; and

The jurisdiction of the governing statute of the converted organization;

A statement that the plan of conversion has been approved by the converting organization as provided in section 10-19.1-104.3;

A statement that the plan of conversion has been approved as required by the governing statute of the converted organization;

The plan of conversion without organization records;

A copy of the originating record of the converted organization; and

If the converted organization is a foreign organization not authorized to transact business or conduct activities in this state, then the street and mailing address of an office which the secretary of state may use for the purposes of subsection 4 of section 10-19.1-104.6.

The articles of conversion must be signed on behalf of the converting organization and filed with the secretary of state.

If the converted organization is a domestic organization:

Then the filing of the articles of conversion must also include the filing with the secretary of state of the originating record of the converted organization.

Upon both the articles of conversion and the originating record of the converted organization being filed with the secretary of state, the secretary of state shall issue a certificate of conversion and the appropriate certificate of creation to the converted organization or its legal representative.

If the converted organization is a foreign organization:

That is transacting business or conducting activities in this state, then:

The filing of the articles of conversion must include the filing with the secretary of state of an application for a certificate of authority by the converted organization.

Upon both the articles of conversion and the application for a certificate of authority by the converted organization being filed with the secretary of state, the secretary of state shall issue a certificate of conversion and the appropriate certificate of authority to the converted organization or the legal representative.

That is not transacting business or conducting activities in this state, then, upon the articles of conversion being filed with the secretary of state, the secretary of state shall issue a certificate of conversion to the converted organization or its legal representative.

A converting organization that is the owner of a service mark, trademark, or trade name, is a general partner named in a fictitious name certificate, is a general partner in a limited partnership or a limited liability limited partnership, or is a managing partner in a limited liability partnership that is on file with the secretary of state must change or amend the name of the converting organization to the name of the converted organization in each registration when filing the articles of conversion.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 100, § 31; 2009, ch. 106, § 17.

10-19.1-104.5.
Abandonment of conversion.

If the articles of conversion have not been filed with the secretary of state, and:

If the converting organization is a corporation, then:

Before a plan of conversion has been approved by the converting corporation as provided in section 10-19.1-104.3, it may be abandoned by an act of its board.

After a plan of conversion has been approved by the converting corporation as provided in section 10-19.1-104.3, and before the effective date of the plan, it may be abandoned:

If the shareholders of the converting corporation entitled to vote on the approval of the plan as provided in section 10-19.1-104.3 have approved the abandonment by an act of the shareholders; or

If the plan provides for abandonment and if all conditions for abandonment set forth in the plan are met.

If the converting organization is not a corporation, then the abandonment of the plan of conversion must comply with its governing statute.

If articles of conversion have been filed with the secretary of state, but have not yet become effective, then the converting organization shall file with the secretary of state articles of abandonment that contain:

The name of the converting organization;

The provision of this section under which the plan is abandoned; and

If the plan is abandoned:

By an act of the board under paragraph 1 of subdivision a of subsection 1, or by an act of the shareholders under subparagraph b of paragraph 2 of subdivision a of subsection 1, then the text of the resolution abandoning the plan; or

As provided in the plan under subparagraph b of paragraph 2 of subdivision a of subsection 1, then a statement that the plan provides for abandonment and that all conditions for abandonment set forth in the plan are met.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 100, § 32.